Washington statutes.
RCW 42.30.075

Schedule of regular meetings—Publication in state register—Notice of change—"Regular" meetings defined.

State agencies which hold regular meetings shall file with the code reviser a schedule of the time and place of such meetings on or before January of each year for publication in the Washington state register. Notice of any change from such meeting schedule shall be published in the state register for distribution at least twenty days prior to the rescheduled meeting date.

For the purposes of this section "regular" meetings shall mean recurring meetings held in accordance with a periodic schedule declared by statute or rule.

[ 1977 ex.s. c 240 s 12.]

NOTES:

Effective date—1977 ex.s. c 240: See RCW 34.08.905.

Public meeting notices in state register: RCW 34.08.020.